California statutes. Education Code
 (c) The minimum fee in any case shall be two hundred fifty dollars ($250). If the actual cost exceeds the estimated cost by more than 5 percent, a further fee shall be paid to the Department of General Services, based on the fee schedule pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b), as applicable, and computed on the amount by which the actual cost exceeds the amount of the estimated cost.

(d) The fees determined pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b), as applicable, shall be paid in two installments, as specified by the Department of General Services. The first installment shall be in an amount equal to 70 percent of the estimated cost calculated under subdivision (a) or (b), as applicable, and shall be paid at the time the application is submitted to the department. The second installment shall be
 in an amount equal to 30 percent of the estimated cost calculated under subdivision (a) or (b), as applicable, and shall be paid no later than five working days after the applicant accepts the bids for construction of the project for which the fees are paid. This subdivision shall become operative January 1, 1994.

(e) The fee shall be paid to the Department of General Services, including, but not limited to, a case in which the application is referred under Section 17306 to a qualified plan review firm.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 19, Sec. 2.   (AB 111)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

17301.

(a) (1) All fees received by the Department of General Services pursuant to this chapter shall be paid into the State Treasury and credited to the Public School Planning, Design, and Construction Review Revolving Fund, which is hereby created. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, all moneys in the fund are hereby continuously appropriated for expenditure by the Department of General Services to be applied, in the most efficient and expeditious manner possible, to the expenses associated with the review and approval of plans and specifications, and the supervision of public school building construction, pursuant to this article and Article 5 (commencing with Section 17350). The fees paid into the fund shall not be used for or diverted to any other
 program or purpose. Notwithstanding any other law, any moneys in the Architecture Public Building Fund on the effective date of this section thereupon shall be transferred to the Public School Planning, Design, and Construction Review Revolving Fund for expenditure in accordance with this section.

 (2) Adjustments in the amounts of the fees, as determined by the Department of General Services, may be made by the department in order to maintain a reasonable working balance in the fund, provided that the fees shall not exceed the amounts in the fee schedule specified in subdivision (a) of Section 17300 or Section 17352, as applicable. If the working fund balance exceeds six months’ expenditures, the Department of General Services shall take action to reduce the fees.

(b) The Department of Finance shall provide for the audit of the fund as needed to ensure that it is used solely for
 the purposes of this article and that the amount of the fee charged does not exceed what is necessary to cover the costs realized by the Department of General Services in carrying out its responsibilities pursuant to this article. The actual cost of the audit shall be paid from the fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 19, Sec. 3.   (AB 111)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

17302.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), all plans, specifications, and estimates shall be prepared by a licensed architect holding a valid certificate under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5500) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code or by a structural engineer holding a valid certificate to use the title structural engineer under Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 6700) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code, and the observation of the work of construction shall be under the responsible charge of such an architect or structural engineer.

(b) For the purposes of this section, a mechanical or electrical engineer holding a valid certificate under Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 6700) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code may be in responsible charge of preparation of plans, specifications, and estimates, and observation of the work of construction where the work is, as determined by the Department of General Services, of the kind normally performed by engineers certified in the particular branch of engineering for which the engineer is certified. Any architectural or structural work involved shall be the respective responsibility of a licensed architect holding a valid certificate under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5500) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code, or a structural engineer holding a valid certificate to use the title structural engineer under Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 6700) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17303.

(a) The Department of General Services shall establish one or more methods to ensure that each application has been completed sufficiently by the applicant to enable the plan review to be performed.

(b) Upon receipt of a complete application, the Department of General Services shall inform the applicant of the period of time that it anticipates to elapse prior to commencing review of the applicant’s plans. Within 10 days of being so notified, the applicant shall make an election to either use the Department of General Services for the review of the applicant’s plan or, request that the plan review be performed by one or more qualified plan review firms pursuant to Sections 17305 and 17306. If the applicant elects to use the services of the Department of General Services for review of the applicant’s plan, the department, as it deems necessary to expedite review of the applicant’s plans, in addition to making a good faith effort to hire state employees, shall do one or more of the following:

(1) Contract for assistance from one or more qualified plan review firms pursuant to Section 17305.

(2) Employ additional staff on a temporary basis.

(3) Maximize the use of department staff through the use of overtime or other appropriate means.

(4) Any other action determined by the department to have the effect of expediting the review and approval process.

(c) Each application shall identify, for purposes of receiving the notifications required under this subdivision, an employee of the applicant school district and either the applicant’s architect or structural engineer. The Department of General Services immediately shall notify that employee, and the identified architect or structural engineer, when each of the following steps in the plan review process occurs:

(1) The department requests the applicant’s architect or structural engineer to correct or complete any part of the application.

(2) An application number is assigned to the application.

(3) Review of the applicant’s plans is commenced.

(4) Review of the applicant’s plans is completed and the department returns the plans to the architect or structural engineer for correction.

(5) Corrected plans are returned to the department by the applicant’s architect or structural engineer for final review and approval.

(6) The department approves the plans and causes a final record set of the plans to be printed in accordance with Section 17304.

(d) The Department of General Services may provide additional notifications to applicants as it deems necessary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 407, Sec. 1.5.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

17304.

(a) Upon approving the plans submitted by an applicant pursuant to this article, the Department of General Services shall cause a final record set of the plans to be printed. The department may contract with one or more private entities to perform that printing at one or more of the regional area offices of the department. The costs incurred pursuant to this subdivision shall be paid by the applicant.

(b) No later than five working days after approving plans submitted by an applicant pursuant to this article, the department shall issue a final letter of approval to the applicant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17305.

(a) Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions set forth in this section govern the construction of this article.

 (1) “Prequalified list” means a list of qualified firms established by the Department of General Services to perform specific types of plan review services.

(2) “Qualified plan review firm” means an individual, firm, or the building official of a city, a county, or a city and county, as defined in Section 18949.27 of the Health and Safety Code, or the authorized representative of the building official that is identified by the Department of General Services as having appropriate expertise and knowledge of the requirements that apply to school buildings under this article.

(b) The department shall establish and maintain a list of qualified plan review firms, and shall make that list available, upon request, to school districts and other interested parties.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 14952 of the Government Code, the Department of General Services shall contract with sufficient numbers of qualified plan review firms for assistance in performing the plan review required under the Field Act.

(d) At the discretion of the Department of General Services, contracts for a qualified plan review firm made pursuant to this article may be advertised and awarded in accordance with this section.

(e) (1) The Department of General Services may establish prequalified lists of qualified firms in accordance with this subdivision.

(2) (A) For each type of plan review for which the department elects to use the process established by this section for advertising and awarding contracts, the Department of General Services may request statements of qualifications from interested firms.

(B) The request for statements of qualifications shall be announced statewide through the California State Contracts Register and publications of relevant professional societies.

(C) Each announcement shall describe the general scope of services to be provided within each generic project category for plan review services that the Department of General Services anticipates may be awarded during the period covered by the announcement. For the purposes of this section, a generic project category shall be defined in a manner that each specific project to be awarded within that discipline meets all of the following requirements:

(i) The project is substantially similar to all other projects within that discipline.

(ii) The project is within the same size range and geographical area.

(iii) The project requires substantially similar skills and magnitude of professional effort as compared to every other project within that discipline.

(3) The Department of General Services shall evaluate the statements of qualifications, and develop a list of qualified plan review firms that meet the criteria established and published by the Department of General Services. Interviews may be held to determine a plan review firm’s qualifications. Lists of qualified plan review firms shall be maintained by the Department of General Services for not more than four years.

(4) During the term of a prequalified list, as specific projects are identified by the Department of General Services as being eligible for contracting, the Department of General Services shall contact a firm on the prequalified list, on a rotational basis, for both of the following purposes:

(A) To distribute the work in a fair and equitable manner.

(B) To determine that the firm has sufficient staff and is available for performance of the project.

(5) If the contacted firm is not available, the Department of General Services shall continue to contact firms on the prequalified list, on a rotational basis, until an available firm is identified.

(6) The Department of General Services shall negotiate a contract for the services with the identified firm, including a price and timeframe that it determines is fair and reasonable.

(7) If the identified plan review firm is unable to negotiate a satisfactory contract with the Department of General Services, the department shall terminate negotiations, and shall undertake new negotiations, on a rotational basis, with the next firm available for performance from the prequalified list until a successful negotiation is achieved. If the Department of General Services is unable to negotiate a satisfactory contract with a firm on two separate occasions, that firm may be removed from the prequalified list.

(f) Contracts for plan review services that the Department of General Services elects to advertise and award in accordance with this section are not subject to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 4525) of Division 5 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 407, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

17306.

(a) Upon submitting a complete application for review under this article, the applicant may request that the Department of General Services refer the documents necessary for the review of that application to a qualified plan review firm operating under contract with the department pursuant to Section 17305. The department immediately shall grant the request and refer the necessary documents to a qualified plan review firm if the applicant so requests.

Upon completing the review, the qualified plan review firm shall submit the documents referred to it for the review of the application, together with the results of its review, to the Department of General Services.

(b) The Department of General Services shall establish a procedure governing the use by applicants of the review process alternative described in this section, including, but not limited to, provisions restricting the use of qualified plan review firms on the basis of conflict of interest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 407, Sec. 11.   Effective August 27, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17307.

No contract for the construction or alteration of any school building, made or executed by the governing board of any school district or other public board, body, or officer otherwise vested with authority to make or execute a contract, is valid, and no public money shall be paid for any work done under a contract or for any labor or materials furnished in constructing or altering any building, unless the plans, specifications, and estimates comply in every particular with the provisions of this article and the requirements prescribed by the Department of General Services and unless the approval thereof in writing has first been had and obtained from the Department of General Services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17307.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, including, but not limited to, Title 3 (commencing with Section 9000) of Part 6 of Division 4 of the Civil Code, the Department of General Services may issue a stop work order when construction work on a public school is not being performed in accordance with existing law and would compromise the structural integrity of the building, thereby endangering the public safety. The Department of General Services shall allow construction of incidental and minor nonstructural additions or nonstructural alterations without invoking its stop work authority.

(b) A school district, county superintendent of schools, county board of
 education, or other public board, body, or officer whose construction work on a public school is subject to a stop work order issued pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not be held liable in any action filed against the public board, body, or officer for stopping work as required by the stop work order, or for any delays caused by compliance with the stop work order, except to the extent that an error or omission by the public board, body, or officer is the basis for the issuance of the stop work order.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 27.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------

17308.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that a number of serious discrepancies in the interpretation of the structural standards and architectural barrier requirements that apply to school buildings under this chapter, and of the plan review procedures that apply under this chapter, exist within the Department of General Services, and within and between various firms utilized by the department on a contract basis, applicant school districts, and architects and structural engineers utilized by applicant school districts.

(b) The Department of General Services shall provide training, on an ongoing basis, to its employees and to the employees of architectural and structural engineering firms that contract with the department for the purposes of this chapter. The training shall address all phases of the plan review process established under this chapter, and shall be designed to ensure that all individuals who develop and review school building plans obtain sufficient knowledge of the rules, regulations, and standards that apply under this chapter.

(c) The department shall make the training described in subdivision (b) available to the employees of architectural and structural engineering firms that contract with applicant school districts for the purpose of this chapter, and to any other individuals, firms, and government agencies that are involved in school building design, construction, or inspection and that may benefit from the training. The department may charge a fee for training provided pursuant to this subdivision.

(d) The department shall develop and publish interpretations of the structural standards, architectural barrier requirements, and review procedures referred to in subdivision (a) as may be necessary to remedy the interpretational discrepancies described in that subdivision. These interpretational materials shall be updated at least annually.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17309.

From time to time, as the work of construction or alteration progresses and whenever the Department of General Services requires, the licensed architect or structural engineer in charge of observation of construction or registered engineer in charge of observation of other work, the inspector on the work, and the contractor shall each make to the Department of General Services a report, duly verified by him or her, upon a form prescribed by the Department of General Services, based upon his or her own personal knowledge, indicating that the work during the period covered by the report has been performed and materials have been used and installed, in every material respect, in compliance with the approved plans and specifications, setting forth such detailed statements of fact as are required by the Department of General Services.

The term “personal knowledge” as used in this section and as applied to the architect, and the registered engineer, means the personal knowledge which is obtained from periodic visits to the project site of reasonable frequency for the purpose of general observation of the work, and also which is obtained from the reporting of others as to the progress of the work, testing of materials, inspection and superintendence of the work that is performed between the above-mentioned periodic visits of the architect or the registered engineer. The exercise of reasonable diligence to obtain the facts is required.

The term “personal knowledge” as applied to the inspector means the actual personal knowledge which is obtained from his or her personal continuous inspection of the work of construction in all stages of its progress at the site where he is responsible for inspection and, when work is carried out away from the site, that personal knowledge which is obtained from the reporting of others on the testing or inspection of materials and workmanship for compliance with plans, specifications or applicable standards. The exercise of reasonable diligence to obtain the facts is required.

The term “personal knowledge” as applied to the contractor means the personal knowledge which is obtained from the construction of the building. The exercise of reasonable diligence to obtain the facts is required.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17310.

Except as provided in Section 18930 of the Health and Safety Code, the Department of General Services may from time to time make such rules and regulations as it deems necessary, proper, or suitable to carry out the provisions of this article.

The Department of General Services shall adopt and submit building standards for approval pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 18935) of Part 2.5 of Division 13 of the Health and Safety Code for the purposes described in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17311.

(a) The Department of General Services shall make the inspection of the school buildings and of the work of construction or alteration as in its judgment is necessary or proper for the enforcement of this article and the protection of the safety of the pupils, the teachers, and the public. The school district, city, city and county, or the political subdivision within the jurisdiction of which any school building is constructed or altered shall provide for and require competent, adequate, and continuous inspection during the construction or alteration by an inspector satisfactory to the architect or structural engineer and the Department of General Services. The inspector shall act under the direction of the governing board and architect or structural engineer as the board may direct. The
 inspector shall be responsible to the governing board for employment purposes. The inspector shall be responsible to the Department of General Services for enforcement of the plans and specifications of the school project.

(b) In order to ensure the competency and adequacy of the inspectors required under this article, the Department of General Services shall do all of the following:

(1) Revise the examination used to determine the competency of those who provide inspections pursuant to this article. The revision of the examination shall include techniques of inspection, construction, plan reading, required submittal documents, and knowledge of statutes and regulations that apply to school construction. The revision of the examination shall be done not later than 36 months after the last revision.

(2) Provide
 training on an ongoing basis to all individuals who provide the inspections required under this article. The training shall be designed to ensure that all individuals who provide the continuous inspection of school building construction or alteration have sufficient knowledge of the rules, regulations, and standards that apply under this article.

(3) Require evaluation of the competency of those who provide inspections pursuant to this article. After an initial evaluation, a reevaluation shall occur not later than 48 months after the last evaluation or reevaluation. An evaluation or reevaluation shall include meeting education and training requirements, as specified by the Department of General Services.

(c) The Department of General Services may require a fee from all individuals applying for evaluation or reevaluation pursuant to subdivision (b), and a fee for the examination
 administered in the evaluation or reevaluation. The fees shall not exceed the reasonable costs associated with the development and administration of the examination and the training.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 197, Sec. 1.   (AB 3058)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

17312.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of this article or makes any false statement in any verified report or affidavit required pursuant to this article is guilty of a felony.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17313.

Upon written request by the governing board of any school district or upon written request by at least 10 percent of the parents having children enrolled as pupils in any school district as certified to by the county superintendent of schools, the Department of General Services shall make an examination and report on the structural condition of any public school building of the district, subject to the payment by the governing board of the actual expenses incurred by the Department of General Services. Payment of the expenses may be waived by the Department of General Services on recommendation of the State Superintendent of Public Instruction when it appears to him or her that the school district in which the public school building is located cannot afford to pay them.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17314.

Any public school building which has been approved by the Department of General Services (formerly Division of Architecture) for occupancy shall be deemed to meet the local building requirements for use as a private school.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17315.

(a) When a school building constructed in accordance with plans and specifications approved by the Department of General Services is completed, the notice of completion is filed, and all final verified reports and all testing and inspection documents, as required by this article or as required by the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this article, are submitted to and on file with the Department of General Services, and all required fees paid by the school district, the department shall issue a certification that the school building complies with the requirements of this article. Nothing in this article shall prevent beneficial occupancy by a school district prior to the issuance of this certification.

(b) When a school building, constructed in accordance with approved plans and specifications, is completed but final verified reports, as are required under Section 39151, have not been submitted to the Department of General Services due to the incapacitating illness, death, or the default of any persons required to file such reports, the Department of General Services shall, upon written request of the school district, review all of the project records and make such examinations as it deems necessary to enable it to certify that the school building otherwise complies with the requirements of this article. The Department of General Services may request the school district to have made, reported, and verified any other tests and inspections which the department deems necessary to complete its examinations of the construction.

(c) The costs incurred by the Department of General Services in connection with this section shall be paid by the school district. The actual costs to perform the examinations, tests, and inspections shall be an appropriate cost of the project to be paid from the building funds of the district. Certification of the project by the Department of General Services shall be withheld until all the costs have been paid by the school district.

(d) This section shall not relieve any individual of his or her responsibility to file verified reports, as required in Section 17309, or any other documents required by the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this article. This section shall not abrogate the provisions of Section 17312.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17316.

(a) Any contract entered into by and between the governing board of any school district and any certified architect or structural engineer pursuant to Section 17302 shall provide that all plans, including, but not limited to, record drawings, specifications, and estimates prepared pursuant thereto, shall be and remain the property of the school district for the purposes of repair, maintenance, renovation, modernization, or other purposes, only as they relate to the project for which the certified architect or structural engineer was retained. This subdivision does not preclude the school district from using the plans, record drawings, specifications, or estimates related to the project for the purposes of additions, alignments, or other development on the site.

(b) The contract set forth in subdivision (a) does not transfer or waive the certified architect’s or structural engineer’s copyrights over these documents, including, but not limited to, all common law, statutory, and other reserved rights, unless the certified architect or structural engineer expressly transfers or waives these rights through the written contract, including, but not limited to, a written addendum or amendment.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), if the school district proposes to reuse the plans prepared by the certified architect or structural engineer within the school district, the contract entered into between the school district and the certified architect or structural engineer shall specify the terms and conditions for the reuse. If a school district reuses the plans prepared by the certified architect or structural engineer and retains another certified architect or structural engineer for the preparation of those plans for the reuse, the school district shall indemnify and hold harmless the original certified architect or structural engineer, and their consultants, agents, and employees, from and against any claims, damages, losses, and expenses, including attorney’s fees, arising out of or resulting from, in whole or in part, the reuse.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 28, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

17317.

(a) The Department of General Services shall, in consultation with the Seismic Safety Commission, conduct an inventory of public school buildings that are concrete tilt-up school buildings and school buildings with nonwood frame walls that do not meet the minimum requirements of the 1976 Uniform Building Code. Priority shall be given to the school buildings identified in the act that added this section that are in the highest seismic risk zones in accordance with the seismic hazard maps of the Division of Mines and Geology of the Department of Conservation.

(b) The Department of General Services shall submit a report by December 31, 2001, to the Legislature and the Governor that summarizes the findings of the seismic safety inventory and makes recommendations about future actions that should be taken to address the problems found by the seismic safety inventory. The report shall not identify individual schoolsites on which inventoried school buildings are located.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 159, Sec. 57.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.3. Collaborative Process for Project Development and Review [17319. - 17319.]

17319.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) The purpose of the collaborative process for project development and review is to ensure the public safety of school facilities through a collaborative, consistent, and timely project development and review process.

(2) The collaborative process for project development and review may be made available, as an alternative to the traditional plan review and approval process, to school districts that voluntarily apply to the Department of General Services.

(3) This process entails the early participation of all parties involved in a
 project from project development and continuing through plan review, construction, and certification of school facilities projects. These parties include the Department of General Services’ staff and their qualified plan review firms, and school districts and their design professionals.

(b) The Department of General Services, in consultation with the Office of Public School Construction, shall establish procedures and requirements governing the use of the collaborative process for project development and review alternative. These procedures and requirements shall include an application and selection process. Upon project selection, the Department of General Services and the school district shall mutually agree to the roles and responsibilities of the Department of General Services, the applicant school district, and its design professionals.

(c) As a part of the establishment of
 the requirements for the collaborative process for project development and review, the Department of General Services, in consultation with participating school districts, shall establish mutually determined timeframe goals for a project’s plan review, school district and consultant response, response review, and final approval. Those timeframe goals shall reflect the project’s estimated construction cost, complexity, size, and other requirements of the collaborative process for project development and review.

(d) The Department of General Services shall establish model statewide timeframe goals, in consultation with school districts and other relevant parties, by February 1, 2007. Implementation of the collaborative process for project development and review with participating school districts shall not negatively impact the traditional plan review process with other school districts.

(e) The Department of General Services shall submit a preliminary report to the Legislature by July 1, 2008, and a final report by July 1, 2009. These reports shall address whether the implementation of the collaborative process for project development and review has assisted the department and school districts in meeting their mutually determined timeframe goals.

(f) The application for the collaborative process for project development and review shall be accompanied by a filing fee from the school district in amounts determined by the Department of General Services based on the estimated project cost and according to the fee schedule pursuant to Section 17300. The Department of General Services may establish a procedure for the payment and collection of this filing fee.

(g) The Department of General Services may assess a fee on a participating school district to
 cover the unreimbursed costs of the department incurred pursuant to that school district’s participation in the collaborative process if the department deems the assessment of the fee to be necessary for the support of its operations and establishes a procedure for the determination, collection, and deposit of the fee.

(h) During project development, the school district may provide input to the Department of General Services in its selection of a qualified plan review firm to provide consultative services to that department. Upon project submittal by the applicant school district, the Department of General Services shall also refer the necessary project documents to the selected qualified plan review firm for plan review. The Department of General Services shall establish procedures governing the use of this article by applicant school districts for the selection of a qualified plan review firm.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 19, Sec. 4.   (AB 111)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.5. Earthquake Construction of Private Schools [17320. - 17336.]

17320.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the Private Schools Building Safety Act of 1986.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17321.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Most of California is subject to potentially devastating, large-magnitude earthquakes.

(b) Earth scientists estimate that there is a greater than 50-percent probability that one or more damaging earthquakes will occur in California between now and the end of the century.

(c) Not all students of private schools enjoy the same or equivalent earthquake safety as is afforded to students of public schools by the Field Act and other legislation.

(d) Modifications of building design, plan checking, and inspection procedures can offer increased protection to private school students.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17322.

It is the intent of the Legislature that children attending private schools be afforded life safety protection similar to that of children attending public schools by having all of the following:

(a) Private school structures designed and constructed in a manner that minimizes fire hazards and resists the forces generated by earthquakes, gravity, and winds to the extent necessary to ensure the safety of occupants.

(b) The structural systems and details set forth in working drawings and specifications carefully reviewed by responsible enforcement agencies using qualified personnel, and the construction process carefully inspected.

(c) Procedures for the design and construction of private school structures to be subjected to qualified design review and construction inspection.

(d) Nonstructural components, including, but not limited to, ceiling systems, electrical equipment, and mechanical equipment given adequate consideration during the design and construction process to assure that they will not detract from occupant safety in the event of an earthquake.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17323.

For the purposes of this article:

(a) “Construction or alteration” means any construction of, addition to, reconstruction of, or structural alteration to any private school structure.

(b) “Enforcement agency” means the agency of a city, city and county, or county responsible for building safety within its jurisdiction.

(c) “Private school structure” means any building used for educational purposes through the 12th grade by 50 or more persons for more than 12 hours per week or 4 hours in any one day. Any structure owned or operated by a public school district shall not be affected by this article.

(d) “Structural engineer” means a person authorized to use the title of structural engineer under Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 6700) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code.
